Utah statutes.
31A-26-308.   Settlement of liability insurance claim not admission of liability.

No settlement or partial settlement of a claim against any insured under a liability insurance policy is an admission, by either the insured or the insurer, of the liability of the insured on any claim arising from the same event or set of facts, whether the settlement is made by the insured, the insurer, or any other person on behalf of the insured or the insurer.

